Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1256.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 107 of the act of July 31, 1968 (P.L.805, No.247), known as the Pennsylvania Municipalities Planning Code, is amended by adding definitions to read:Section 107. Definitions.--(a) The following words and 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425262728 phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Accessory dwelling unit," a self-contained living unit on the same parcel as a single-family dwelling of greater square footage that includes cooking, sleeping and sanitation facilities and complies with, or is otherwise exempt from, any applicable building code, fire code or public health or safety regulation.* * *"Gross floor area," the interior habitable area of a single-family dwelling or an accessory dwelling unit.* * *Section 2. The act is amended by adding sections to read:Section 603.2. Accessory Dwelling Units.--(a) (1) A municipality shall adopt an ordinance that:(i) Allows a minimum of one accessory dwelling unit on a lot or parcel that contains a single-family dwelling. A municipality may, by ordinance, authorize a greater number of accessory dwelling units per lot.(ii) Allows an accessory dwelling unit that is:(A) attached to a single-family dwelling;(B) detached from a single-family dwelling;(C) contained within the single-family dwelling; or(D) currently constructed or may be constructed.(iii) Sets a maximum gross floor area for an accessory dwelling unit that is 1,250 square feet or the gross floor area of the single-family dwelling, whichever is less, or the entire floor plate of a basement or 20260SB1256PN1568 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 attic.(iv) Allows an accessory dwelling unit to be used as rental housing.(v) Provides a process by which a person may apply to construct an accessory dwelling unit.(vi) Requires accessory dwelling units to be physically distinct and not be combined into a single structure containing more than one dwelling unit. An accessory dwelling unit may not share a common interior wall with another accessory dwelling unit.(vii) Provides that the presence of more than one accessory dwelling unit on a lot or parcel containing a single-family dwelling shall not constitute multifamily housing, an apartment building or a multifamily dwelling, and shall not cause the lot or parcel to be reclassified as multifamily residential use.(2) Nothing in clause (1) shall be construed to prohibit a municipality from adopting an ordinance limiting the total number of accessory dwelling units permitted on a single lot or parcel, provided that such ordinance permits no fewer than one accessory dwelling unit as required under subclause (i).(3) An ordinance adopted under clause (1) may not:(i) Require that a lot or parcel have additional parking to accommodate an accessory dwelling unit or require fees in lieu of additional parking.(ii) Require that an accessory dwelling unit match the exterior design, roof pitch, finishing materials, architectural design or color of, or be similar to, the single-family dwelling.(iii) Require that the single-family dwelling or the 20260SB1256PN1568 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 accessory dwelling unit be occupied by the owner.(iv) Require a familial, marital or employment relationship between the occupants of the single family dwelling and the occupants of the accessory dwelling unit.(v) Require periodic license renewal of an accessory dwelling unit.(vi) Assess impact fees on the construction of an accessory dwelling unit.(vii) Require improvements to public streets as a condition of permitting an accessory dwelling unit.(viii) Set maximum building heights, minimum setback requirements, minimum lot sizes, maximum lot coverages or minimum building frontages for accessory dwelling units that are more restrictive than those for single-family dwellings.(ix) Impose more onerous zoning regulations on an accessory dwelling unit beyond the regulations required by this section.(x) Require a restrictive covenant concerning an accessory dwelling unit on a parcel zoned for residential use by a single-family dwelling. This subclause may not be construed to prohibit restrictive covenants concerning accessory dwelling units entered into between private parties, but the municipality may not condition a permit, license or use of an accessory dwelling unit on the adoption or implementation of a restrictive covenant entered into between private parties.(xi) Require that an accessory dwelling unit meet storm water or water quality standards that a single-20260SB1256PN1568 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 family detached dwelling unit on the same lot is not required to meet.(xii) Require subdivision, increased minimum lot size, increased minimum frontage or increased open space as a condition of permitting a single accessory dwelling unit.(4) Nothing in clause (3) shall be construed to prohibit a municipality from adopting an ordinance which requires subdivision, increased minimum lot sizes, increased minimum frontage or increased open space as a condition of permitting a second or additional accessory dwelling units, provided such requirements are established under a duly adopted local ordinance.(5) A municipality may require a fee for reviewing an application to create an accessory dwelling unit. The one-time application fee for the license may be up to $250 for each accessory dwelling unit. Nothing in this clause shall be construed to prohibit a municipality from requiring the municipality's building fees in addition to the application fee.(6) A municipality that has not adopted or amended ordinances pursuant to this subsection by January 1, 2027, shall review and permit accessory dwelling units in accordance with the requirements of this section until ordinances are adopted or amended. An ordinance in effect on or after January 1, 2027, that applies to accessory dwelling units and does not comply with this section is void.(7) The provisions of this subsection do not supersede applicable building codes, fire codes or public health or safety regulations.20260SB1256PN1568 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (b) (1) The following application process shall apply for an accessory dwelling unit:(i) A permit application for an accessory dwelling unit shall be considered and approved without discretionary review or a hearing.(ii) The permitting agency shall approve or deny an application to create or serve an accessory dwelling unit within:(A) 30 days from the date the permitting agency receives the completed application; or(B) 60 days if additional review is required.(iii) If the permit application to create or serve an accessory dwelling unit is submitted with a permit application to create or serve a new single-family dwelling unit on the lot, the permitting agency may delay approving or denying the permit application for the accessory dwelling unit until the permitting agency approves or denies the permit application to create or serve the new single-family dwelling unit.(iv) If the applicant requests a delay, the time period provided under subclause (ii) shall be tolled for the period of the delay.(v) If the permitting agency determines an application is incomplete, the permitting agency shall provide the applicant with a list of incomplete items and a description of how the application can be made complete. The following shall apply:(A) The list and description shall be provided with the written notice. After receiving a notice that the application is incomplete, an applicant may 20260SB1256PN1568 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 cure and address the items that are deemed to be incomplete by the permitting agency.(B) In the review of an application, the permitting agency shall not require the application to include an item that was not included in the list of incomplete items.(C) If an applicant submits a cured application, the permitting agency shall determine whether the additional application has remedied all incomplete items listed in the determination.(D) The cured application is subject to the timelines and requirements of an original application under this subsection.(vi) If the permitting agency has not approved or denied the completed application within the time period provided under subclause (ii), the application shall be deemed approved.(vii) A permitting agency may charge a fee, which shall not exceed $250 in the aggregate, for costs incurred to review the permit application for the creation or service of an accessory dwelling unit.(viii) A permitting agency may not require a renewal for a permit for an accessory dwelling unit.(ix) If a permitting agency does not make a timely determination as required by this subsection, the application or cured application shall be deemed to be complete for the purposes of this section.(2) If a permitting agency denies an application for an accessory dwelling unit, the permitting agency shall return in writing a full set of comments to the applicant with a 20260SB1256PN1568 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 list of items that are defective or deficient and a description of how the applicant may remedy the application. No local ordinance, policy or regulation, other than an accessory dwelling unit ordinance consistent with this article, shall be the basis for the delay or denial of a building permit or a use permit under this section.Section 621.1. Public Availability of Public Utility Fees.--(a) Prior to providing utility service connections for new housing construction, including the construction of an accessory dwelling unit, each public utility providing service to the new housing construction shall make available on the public utility's publicly accessible Internet website, in a clear and accessible format:(1) a schedule of estimated fees for the utility service connection; and(2) a schedule of standard estimated time frames for completing typical utility service connections for each housing development type.(b) The fee schedule under subsection (a) must include, at a minimum:(1) connection charges, capacity charges and any other upfront costs reasonably expected for service connection;(2) distinct listings for accessory dwelling units, which shall be separate from larger multifamily or commercial classifications; and(3) definitions for each development type used to classify the fee estimates.(c) Each utility provider shall review and, if necessary, update the fee schedules under subsection (a) at least annually and provide notice of any changes on the public utility's 20260SB1256PN1568 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 publicly accessible Internet website where the schedules are posted.(d) This section shall apply to each public utility regulated by the Pennsylvania Public Utility Commission.(e) As used in this section, the term "public utility" shall have the same meaning given to it under 66 Pa.C.S. § 102 (relating to definitions).Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260SB1256PN1568 - 9 - 12345678